Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 10. Provisions Relating to Damages

§ 808.
Payment of damages.

When a court orders damages to be paid to a person for injury done to his or her lands by laying out or altering a highway, it may allow the town a reasonable time to pay the damages, not exceeding the time allowed for opening the highway.
If the sum allowed is not paid within the time limited, the clerk of the court shall issue execution for the sum.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 809.
Value of discontinued highway.

When a discontinued highway belongs to the owner of land through which a highway is laid out, the value may be taken into consideration in estimating the damages sustained by the owner.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 810.
Allowance lands.

When a lot of land remains entire, as originally divided among the proprietors of a town, and is owned by one person, or jointly, to which a quantity of land was allowed for the use of highways more than has been taken up by highways already laid out, and a highway is laid through the lot, the allowance land may be taken into consideration in estimating the damages sustained by the owner.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 811.
Benefits to landowner considered.

In estimating the damages sustained by a person owning or interested in lands, by reason of laying out or altering a highway, the benefits which the person may receive shall be taken into consideration.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.